fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires de sécurité pour bébés: Accessoires pour barrières de sécurité; Barrières de sécurité; Écoute-bébés; Harnais de sécurité pour enfants; Verrous et accessoires de sécurité pour bébés; Barrières de lit pour bébés
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių sauga: Vartelių kūdikiams ir naminiams gyvūnams priedai; Varteliai kūdikiams ir naminiams gyvūnams; Kūdikių monitoriai; Kūdikių saugos petnešos ir pavadėliai; Kūdikių saugos spynos ir apsaugos; Kūdikių saugos turėklai
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Безопасност на бебето: Аксесоари за врати за бебета и домашни любимци; Прегради за бебета и домашни любимци; Бебефони; Предпазни каишки и колани за прохождане; Бебешки ключалки и предпазители; Предпазни релси за бебета
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー用安全グッズ: セーフティゲート関連用品; セーフティゲート; ベビーモニター; 迷子防止リュック・ハーネス; ベビーガード・チャイルドロック; ベビーベッド用サイドレール
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴儿安全用品: 婴儿/宠物安全门栏附件; 婴儿/宠物防护栏; 婴儿监护器; 婴儿学步带/防走失绳; 婴儿安全锁与护栏; 婴儿安全床边护栏
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan turvallisuus: Vauva- ja lemmikkiporttien lisätarvikkeet; Vauva- ja lemmikkiportit; Itkuhälyttimet; Vauvan turvavaljaat ja -hihnat; Vauvan turvalukot ja suojaus; Vauvan turvakaiteet
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Protección para el bebé: Accesorios para puertas de seguridad; Puertas para niños y mascotas; Interfonos para bebés; Correas y arneses de seguridad para bebés; Protectores y cierres de seguridad; Barandillas de seguridad
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Segurança do bebé: Acessórios de barreiras de segurança para aninhais e bebés; Barreiras de segurança para aninhais e bebés; Monitores de bebé; Trelas e arneses para segurança do bebé; Bloqueios e proteções para segurança do bebé; Parques de segurança para bebés
pt-BR: Infantil > Segurança de bebês: Acessórios para grades de segurança; Grades de segurança para bebês e animais de estimação; Monitores de bebês; Arnêses e guias de segurança para bebês; Travas e dispositivos de segurança para bebês; Grades de segurança para bebês
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Siguranța bebelușului: Accesorii pentru poartă copii și animale de companie; Porți pentru copii și animale de companie; Monitoare pentru bebeluși; Hamuri și lese de siguranță pentru bebeluși; Încuietori și dispozitive de protecție pentru copii; Balustrade de siguranță pentru bebeluși
cs: Děti a kojenci > Potřeby pro bezpečnost dětí: Bezpečnostní zábrany – příslušenství; Bezpečnostní zábrany; Dětské monitory; Bezpečnostní popruhy a řemínky pro děti; Dětské pojistky; Dětská zábradlí
sv: Baby och småbarn > Babysäkerhet: Tillbehör till barn- och djurgrindar; Bebis- och djurgrindar; Babyvakter; Säkerhetsselar och koppel för barn; Barnsäkerhetslås och skydd; Säkerhetsspjälor
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒安全: 嬰兒/寵物安全小門配件; 嬰兒/寵物小門; 嬰兒監視器; 兒童防走失繩; 嬰兒安全鎖/護具; 嬰兒床護欄
nl: Baby en peuter > Babyveiligheid: Accessoires voor beveiligingshekken; Beveiligingshekken; Babyfoons; Veiligheidstuigjes en -banden voor baby's; Veiligheidssloten voor baby's; Veiligheidsrails voor baby's
sk-SK: Bábätká > Bezpečnosť detí: Príslušenstvo k zábranám pre deti a domácich miláčikov; Zábrany pre deti a domácich miláčikov; Detské pestúnky; Detské bezpečnostné postroje a vôdzky; Detské bezpečnostné zámky a chrániče; Detské bezpečnostné zábradlie
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Varnost dojenčka: Dodatki za otroške varnostne ograje in ograje za hišne ljubljenčke; Varnostne ograje za otroke in hišne ljubljenčke; Otroški monitorji; Otroški varnostni pasovi in povodci; Varnostne ključavnice in varovala za dojenčke; Otroške varnostne ograje
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Sigurnost bebe: Pribor za ogradice za bebe i ljubimce; Ogradice za bebe i kućne ljubimce; Monitori za bebe; Sigurnosni pojasevi i povodci za bebe; Sigurnosne brave i zaštite za bebe; Sigurnosne ograde za bebe
ru: Товары для детей > Безопасность детей: Аксессуары для защитных барьеров для детей и домашних животных; Защитные барьеры для детей и домашних животных; Электронные няни; Детские вожжи и поводки; Замки-блокираторы и защитные накладки; Защитные ограждения
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Güvenliği: Bebek ve Evcil Hayvan Kapısı Aksesuarları; Bebek ve Evcil Hayvan Kapıları; Bebek İzleme Cihazları; Bebek Güvenlik Kayışları; Bebek Emniyet Kilitleri ve Muhafazaları; Bebek Güvenlik Çitleri
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > An toàn cho bé: Phụ kiện cửa chắn trẻ em và vật nuôi; Cửa chặn em bé và thú cưng; Thiết bị theo dõi trẻ sơ sinh; Dây dắt bé; Khóa và thiết bị bảo vệ an toàn cho trẻ em; Thanh chắn giường an toàn cho trẻ sơ sinh
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Bezpieczeństwo niemowląt: Akcesoria do bramek ochronnych dla dzieci i zwierząt; Bramki ochronne dla dzieci i zwierząt; Nianie elektroniczne; Szelki i smycze dla dzieci; Blokady i zabezpieczenia przed dziećmi; Barierki do łóżek dziecięcych
da: Baby og småbørn > Baby – sikkerhedsudstyr: Tilbehør til sikkerhedslåge for børn og kæledyr; Børne- og kæledyrsgitter; Babyalarmer; Babyseler og -snore; Børnesikring; Sengeheste
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์ความปลอดภัยสำหรับทารก: อุปกรณ์ประตูสำหรับทารกและสัตว์เลี้ยง; ประตูสำหรับทารกและสัตว์เลี้ยง; เครื่องตรวจสอบทารก; อุปกรณ์และสายจูงเด็ก; ล็อกและที่กั้นเพื่อความปลอดภัยสำหรับทารก; ราวเพื่อความปลอดภัยสำหรับทารก
nb: Baby og barn > Babysikkerhet: Tilbehør for baby- og husdyrgrinder; Baby- og husdyrgrinder; Babycaller; Sikkerhetsseler for baby; Sikkerhetslåser for baby; Sikkerhetsskinner for baby
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Babysicherheit: Zubehör für Baby- & Haustierschutzgitter; Baby- & Haustierschutzgitter; Babyfone; Babysicherheitsgurte & -leinen; Babysicherungen & Schutzvorrichtungen; Baby-Schutzleisten
it: Bebè e bimbi > Sicurezza dei bebè: Accessori per cancelletti di sicurezza; Cancelletti di sicurezza; Interfoni per interni; Imbracature/guinzagli sicurezza bebè; Blocchi di sicurezza per bambini; Barriere letto per bambini
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Bababiztonság: Baba- és háziállatkapu-kiegészítők; Baba- és háziállatkapuk; Babafigyelők; Bababiztonsági hevederek és pórázok; Bababiztonsági zárak és védők; Bababiztonsági sínek
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Βρεφική ασφάλεια: Αξεσουάρ πόρτας για βρέφη & κατοικίδια ζώα; Πόρτες για μωρά & κατοικίδια ζώα; Μόνιτορ μωρού; Ζώνες και λουριά ασφαλείας για βρέφη; Κλειδαριές και προστατευτικά ασφαλείας για βρέφη; Κάγκελα ασφαλείας για βρέφη
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Safety: Baby & Pet Gate Accessories; Baby & Pet Gates; Baby Monitors; Baby Safety Harnesses & Leashes; Baby Safety Locks & Guards; Baby Safety Rails
ko: 영유아 > 영유아 안전용품: 영유아/반려동물용 게이트 부대용품; 영유아/반려동물용 게이트; 베이비 모니터; 영유아 안전띠/미아방지띠; 영유아용 안전 잠금장치/가드; 아기 침대 가드